District of Columbia statutes.
28-4918

Interoperability.

The Mayor, in adopting standards pursuant to § 28-4917, may encourage and promote consistency and interoperability with similar requirements adopted by other governmental agencies of this and other states and the federal government and nongovernmental persons interacting with governmental agencies of the District of Columbia. If appropriate, those standards may specify differing levels of standards from which governmental agencies of the District of Columbia may choose in implementing the most appropriate standard for a particular application.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3502(b), 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 64, 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3202(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 19 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (1999 Act).